New Jersey, session 222, S2951.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 55 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-323) is amended to read as follows: 55.  As used in sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335): "Agency" means the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency established pursuant to P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.). "Authority" means the New Jersey Economic Development Authority established by section 4 of P.L.1974, c.80 (C.34:1B-4). "Aviation district" means all areas within the boundaries of the Atlantic City International Airport, established pursuant to section 24 of P.L.1991, c.252 (C.27:25A-24), and the Federal Aviation Administration William J. Hughes Technical Center and the area within a one-mile radius of the outermost boundary of the Atlantic City International Airport and the Federal Aviation Administration William J. Hughes Technical Center, and the Trenton-Mercer Airport, established pursuant to R.S.40:8-2 and the area within a one-mile radius of the outermost boundary of the Trenton-Mercer Airport. "Board" means the Board of the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, established by section 4 of P.L.1974, c.80 (C.34:1B-4). "Building services" means any cleaning or routine building maintenance work, including but not limited to sweeping, vacuuming, floor cleaning, cleaning of rest rooms, collecting refuse or trash, window cleaning, securing, patrolling, or other work in connection with the care or securing of an existing building, including services typically provided by a door-attendant or concierge.  "Building services" shall not include any skilled maintenance work, professional services, or other public work for which a contractor is required to pay the "prevailing wage" as defined in section 2 of P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.26). "Cash flow" means the profit or loss that an investment property earns from rent, deposits, and other fees after financial obligations, such as debt, maintenance, government payments, and other expenses, have been paid. "Collaborative workspace" means coworking, accelerator, incubator, or other shared working environments that promote collaboration, interaction, socialization, and coordination among tenants through the clustering of multiple businesses or individuals.  For this purpose, the collaborative workspace shall be the greater of: 2,500 of dedicated square feet or 10 percent of the total property on which the redevelopment project is situated.  The collaborative workspace shall include a community manager, be focused on collaboration among the community members, and include regularly scheduled education events for the community members.  The collaborative workspace shall also include a physical open space that supports the engagement of its community members. "Commercial project" means a redevelopment project, other than an institutional project, which is predominantly commercial and, if located in a government-restricted municipality, contains 25,000 or more square feet, or if located in any other municipality, contains 50,000 or more square feet of office and retail space, industrial space, or film studios, professional stages, television studios, recording studios, screening rooms, or other infrastructure for film production, and may include a parking component.  The term "commercial project" includes a redevelopment project comprised solely of a health care or health services center, which contains not less than 10,000 square feet devoted to health care or health services, and which may include a parking component.  The term "commercial project" also includes an industrial space that is predominantly used for warehouse distribution or fulfillment centers if the eligible project cost includes at least $10,000,000 in environmental remediation costs. "Developer" means a person who enters or proposes to enter into an incentive award agreement pursuant to the provisions of section 60 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-328), including, but not limited, to a lender that completes a redevelopment project, operates a redevelopment project, or completes and operates a redevelopment project. "Director" means the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. "Distressed hospital project" means a health care or health services center, hospital, or hospital system that: operates a minimum of four general acute care hospitals licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.); incurred average annual costs of not less than $250,000 for the provision of charity care services, not including the value of charity care subsidies or reimbursements received through any governmental assistance program, as measured by the five most recent calendar years, immediately preceding the date of application for the program, for which audited financial statements are available; and is owned or leased by an organization that is exempt from federal taxation pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of section 501 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.501(c)(3), including any wholly-owned subsidiary thereof, which organization or subsidiary has filed a bankruptcy petition pursuant to Title 11 of the United States Code. "Distressed municipality" means a municipality that is qualified to receive assistance under P.L.1978, c.14 (C.52:27D-178 et seq.), a municipality under the supervision of the Local Finance Board pursuant to the provisions of the "Local Government Supervision Act (1947)," P.L.1947, c.151 (C.52:27BB-1 et seq.), a municipality identified by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs to be facing serious fiscal distress, a SDA municipality, or a municipality in which a major rail station is located. "Economic development incentive" means a financial incentive, awarded by the authority, or agreed to between the authority and a business or person, for the purpose of stimulating economic development or redevelopment in New Jersey, including, but not limited to, a bond, grant, loan, loan guarantee, matching fund, tax credit, or other tax expenditure. "Eligibility period" means the period not to exceed 10 years, as specified in an incentive award agreement during which a developer may claim a tax credit under the program, as such period shall be determined by the authority pursuant to subsection b. of section 60 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-328), provided that a developer may elect a period not to exceed five years for a project located in a government-restricted municipality or for a special mission non-profit project or a distressed hospital project. "Enhanced area" means (1) a municipality that contains an urban transit hub, as defined in section 2 of P.L.2007, c.346 (C.34:1B-208); (2) the five municipalities with the highest poverty rates according to the 2017 Municipal Revitalization Index; and (3) the three municipalities with the highest percentage of SNAP recipients according to the 2017 Municipal Revitalization Index. "Environmental remediation costs" means any costs incurred by a developer in the completion of any actions necessary to investigate, clean up, or respond to a known, suspected, or threatened discharge of contaminants, including, as necessary, the preliminary assessment, site investigation, remedial investigation, and remedial action, pursuant to sections 23 through 43 and section 45 of P.L.1993, c.139 (C.58:10B-1 et seq.). "Food delivery source" means access to nutritious foods, such as fresh fruits and vegetables, through grocery operators, including, but not limited to a full-service supermarket or grocery store, and other healthy food retailers of at least 16,000 square feet, including, but not limited to, a prepared food establishment selling primarily nutritious ready-to-serve meals. "Food desert community" means a physically contiguous area in the State in which residents have limited access to nutritious foods, such as fresh fruits and vegetables, and that has been designated as a food desert community pursuant to subsection b. of section 38 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-306). "Government-restricted municipality" means a municipality in this State with a municipal revitalization index distress score of at least 75, that met the criteria for designation as an urban aid municipality in the 2019 State fiscal year, and that, on the effective date of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.), is subject to financial restrictions imposed pursuant to the "Municipal Stabilization and Recovery Act," P.L.2016, c.4 (C.52:27BBBB-1 et seq.), or is restricted in its ability to levy property taxes on property in that municipality as a result of the State of New Jersey owning or controlling property representing at least 25 percent of the total land area of the municipality or as a result of the federal government of the United States owning or controlling at least 50 acres of the total land area of the municipality, which is dedicated as a national natural landmark.  The term "government-restricted municipality" also includes any municipality that: has a population greater than 50,000 and less than 60,000 according to the latest federal decennial census, is designated as the county seat of a county of the second class with a population greater than 800,000 according to the latest federal decennial census, and has an MRI distress score of 62.1; has a population greater than 70,000 and less than 100,000 according to the latest federal decennial census, is designated as the county seat of a county of the second class with a population greater than 515,000 and less than 525,000 according to the latest federal decennial census, and has an MRI distress score of 100; or contains the intersection of Interstate 280 and the Garden State Parkway, and corresponding land areas occupied by such highways under the ownership or control of the federal government of the United States or of this State within its municipal boundary, and has an MRI distress score of 55.5. "Health care or health services center" means an establishment that consists of not less than 10,000 square feet devoted to health care or health services, where patients are admitted for or seek examination and treatment by one or more physicians, dentists, psychologists, or other medical practitioners and which is located in a municipality with an MRI distress score of at least 50, a distressed municipality, or a qualified incentive tract or is located on land owned by the federal government of the United States on or before December 31, 2005. "Hospitality establishment" means a hotel, motel, or any business, however organized, that sells food, beverages, or both for consumption by patrons on the premises. "Incentive area" means an aviation district; a port district; an area designated pursuant to the "State Planning Act," P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et seq.), as Planning Area 1 (Metropolitan), Planning Area 2 (Suburban), or a Designated Center under the State Development and Redevelopment Plan; an area designated as a brownfield site pursuant to the "Brownfield and Contaminated Site Remediation Act," sections 23 through 43 and section 45 of P.L.1993, c.139 (C.58:10B-1 et seq.); and an area of not less than 100 acres for which a licensed site remediation professional has certified environmental remediation costs, as defined in this section and in accordance with the "Site Remediation Reform Act," sections 1 through 29 of P.L.2009, c.60 (C.58:10C-1 et seq.), in an amount not less than $10,000,000, provided that any portion of such area is located in an area that otherwise qualifies as an incentive area. "Incentive award" means an award of tax credits to reimburse a developer for all or a portion of the project financing gap of a redevelopment project pursuant to the provisions of sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335). "Incentive award agreement" means the contract executed between a developer and the authority pursuant to section 60 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-328), which sets forth the terms and conditions under which the developer may receive the incentive awards authorized pursuant to the provisions of sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335). "Incubator facility" means a commercial property, which contains 5,000 or more square feet of office, laboratory, or industrial space, which is located near, and presents opportunities for collaboration with, a research institution, teaching hospital, college, or university, and within which at least 75 percent of the gross leasable area is restricted for use by one or more technology startup companies. "Individuals with special needs" means individuals with mental illness, individuals with physical or developmental disabilities, and individuals in other emerging special needs groups identified by the authority, based on guidelines established for the administration of the Special Needs Housing Trust Fund established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2005, c.163 (C.34:1B-21.25a) or developed in consultation with other State agencies. "Institutional project" means a redevelopment project that is developed by, or in affiliation with, an institution of higher education with a research activity designation of Research 1 (R1) or Research 2 (R2) from the Carnegie Classification of Institutions of Higher Education, and for which 51 percent of the square footage of the project is dedicated for the use of qualified research and development. "Labor harmony agreement" means an agreement between a business that serves as the owner or operator of a retail establishment, hospitality establishment, or distribution center and one or more labor organizations, which requires, for the duration of the agreement: that any participating labor organization and its members agree to refrain from picketing, work stoppages, boycotts, or other economic interference against the business; and that the business agrees to maintain a neutral posture with respect to efforts of any participating labor organization to represent employees at an establishment or other unit in the retail establishment, hospitality establishment, or distribution center, agrees to permit the labor organization to have access to the employees, and agrees to guarantee to the labor organization the right to obtain recognition as the exclusive collective bargaining representatives of the employees in an establishment or unit at the retail establishment, hospitality establishment, or distribution center by demonstrating to the New Jersey State Board of Mediation, Division of Private Employment Dispute Settlement, or a mutually agreed-upon, neutral third party that a majority of workers in the unit have shown their preference for the labor organization to be their representative by signing authorization cards indicating that preference.  The labor organization or organizations shall be from a list of labor organizations which have requested to be on the list and which the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development has determined represent substantial numbers of retail establishment, hospitality establishment, or distribution center employees in the State. "Low-income housing" means housing affordable according to federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to 50 percent or less of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located. "Major cultural institution" means a public or nonprofit institution, not including an institution of higher education, within this State that engages in the cultural, intellectual, scientific, environmental, educational, or artistic enrichment of the people of this State, and which institution is designated by the board as a major cultural institution. "Major rail station" means a railroad station that is located within a qualified incentive area and that provides to the public access to a minimum of six rail passenger service lines operated by the New Jersey Transit Corporation. "Minimum environmental and sustainability standards" means standards established by the authority in accordance with the green building manual prepared by the Commissioner of Community Affairs pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2007, c.132 (C.52:27D-130.6), regarding the use of renewable energy, energy-efficient technology, and non-renewable resources to reduce environmental degradation and encourage long-term cost reduction. "Moderate-income housing" means housing affordable according to federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to more than 50 percent, but less than 80 percent, of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located. "MRI distress score" means a municipal revitalization index distress score, as documented in the 2023 Municipal Revitalization Index developed by the Department of Community Affairs. "Municipal Revitalization Index" means the index by the Department of Community Affairs ranking New Jersey's municipalities according to eight separate indicators that measure diverse aspects of social, economic, physical, and fiscal conditions in each locality. "Port district" means the portions of a qualified incentive area that are located within: the "Port of New York District" of the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey, as defined in Article II of the Compact Between the States of New York and New Jersey of 1921; or a 15-mile radius of the outermost boundary of each marine terminal facility established, acquired, constructed, rehabilitated, or improved by the South Jersey Port District established pursuant to "The South Jersey Port Corporation Act," P.L.1968, c.60 (C.12:11A-1 et seq.). "Program" means the New Jersey Aspire Program established by section 56 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-324). "Project cost" or " eligible project cost" means the costs incurred in connection with a redevelopment project by a developer until the issuance of a permanent certificate of occupancy, or until such other time specified by the authority, for a specific investment or improvement, including the costs relating to lands, except the cost of acquiring such lands, buildings, improvements, real or personal property, or any interest therein, including leases discounted to present value, including lands under water, riparian rights, space rights, and air rights acquired, owned, developed or redeveloped, constructed, reconstructed, rehabilitated, or improved, any environmental remediation costs, plus costs not directly related to construction, including capitalized interest paid to third parties, of an amount not to exceed 20 percent of the total costs and the cost of infrastructure improvements, including ancillary infrastructure projects.  When 100 percent of the residential units constructed in a residential project are reserved for occupancy by low- and moderate-income households, the term "project cost" shall also include the developer fees paid before acquiring permanent financing, as well as the deferred developer fees approved pursuant to the rules established by the agency.  In addition to the foregoing, the term "project cost" shall include, for a redevelopment project located in a government-restricted municipality or for a distressed hospital project, land costs in an amount not to exceed 20 percent of the eligible project cost.  The fees associated with the application or administration of a grant under sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335) shall not constitute a project cost.  For an institutional project, the term project cost shall also include the construction and completion of:  research workspaces; meeting, classroom, dining, and dormitory spaces; and common areas, including, but not limited to, hallways, utility rooms, storage areas, and parking components. "Project financing gap" means the part of the total project cost, including reasonable and appropriate return on investment, that remains to be financed after all other sources of capital have been accounted for, including, but not limited to developer contributed capital, which shall not be less than 20 percent of the total project cost, and investor or financial entity capital or loans for which the developer, after making all good faith efforts to raise additional capital, certifies that additional capital cannot be raised from other sources on a non-recourse basis, provided, however, that for a redevelopment project located in a government-restricted municipality, the developer contributed capital shall not be less than 10 percent of the total project cost.  Developer contributed capital may consist of cash, deferred development fees, costs for project feasibility incurred within the 12 months prior to application, property value less any mortgages when the developer owns the project site, and any other investment by the developer in the project deemed acceptable by the authority, as provided by regulations promulgated by the authority.  Property value shall be valued at the lesser of: (i) the purchase price, provided the property was purchased pursuant to an arm's length transaction within 12 months of application; or (ii) the value as determined by a current appraisal. "Project labor agreement" means a form of pre-hire collective bargaining agreement covering terms and conditions of a specific project that satisfies the requirements set forth in section 5 of P.L.2002, c.44 (C.52:38-5). "Qualified incentive tract" means a population census tract having a poverty rate of 20 percent or more or a census tract in which the median family income for the census tract does not exceed 80 percent of the greater of the Statewide median family income or the median family income of the metropolitan statistical area in which the census tract is situated. Qualified research and development means research and development activities undertaken within a priority industry, including, but not limited to, technology, artificial intelligence, software development, financial services, financial services technology, film and digital media, advanced manufacturing, gaming, pharmaceuticals, biotechnology, transportation, logistics, and renewable energy. "Quality childcare facility" is a child care center licensed by the Department of Children and Families or a registered family child care home with the Department of Human Services, operating continuously, which has not been subject to an enforcement action, and which has and maintains a licensed capacity for children age 13 years or younger who attend for less than 24 hours a day. "Reasonable and appropriate return on investment" means the discount rate at which the present value of the future cash flows of an investment equals the cost of the investment.  In determining the "reasonable and appropriate return on investment," an investment shall not include any federal, State, or local tax credits.  For a residential project that utilizes federal low-income housing tax credits awarded by the agency, the "reasonable and appropriate return on investment" shall be based on the approval of deferred developer fees pursuant to the rules established by the agency.  In the event that a residential project, which utilizes federal low-income housing tax credits awarded by the agency, generates returns on equity other than federal or local grants or proceeds from the sale of federal or local tax credits, the "reasonable and appropriate return on investment" shall be based on both the discount rate at which the present value of the future cash flows of an investment equal the cost of the investment for the entire project, and when evaluating only the units financed with federal low-income housing tax credits awarded by the agency, the approval of deferred developer fees pursuant to the rules established by the agency. "Redevelopment project" means a specific construction project or improvement or phase of a project or improvement undertaken by a developer, owner or tenant, or both, and any ancillary infrastructure project.  A redevelopment project may involve construction or improvement upon lands, buildings, improvements, or real and personal property, or any interest therein, including lands under water, riparian rights, space rights, and air rights, acquired, owned, developed or redeveloped, constructed, reconstructed, rehabilitated, or improved. "Residential project" means a redevelopment project, other than an institutional project, that is predominantly residential, intended for multi-family residency, and may include a parking component. "SDA district" means an SDA district as defined in section 3 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-3). "SDA municipality" means a municipality in which an SDA district is situated. "Special mission non-profit project" means a project located in a government-restricted municipality or in an enhanced area that: serves a special mission, as determined by the authority, to accomplish the public purpose of a non-profit that is a developer of or is affiliated with the project and includes no more than 100 units of 100 percent supportive housing units for tenants requiring special needs or social services, which social services may include licensed social workers, and no more than  25,000 square feet of commercial space for the provision of on-site social service programs that require a license from the Department of Children and Families as a licensed child care center. Special mission non-profit projects shall be exempt from the net benefit test requirement, affordable housing requirements, and the requirement to provide a market study as part of its application to the authority. "Technology startup company" means a for-profit business that has been in operation fewer than seven years at the time that it initially occupies or expands in a qualified business facility and is developing or possesses a proprietary technology or business method of a high technology or life science-related product, process, or service, which proprietary technology or business method the business intends to move to commercialization.  The business shall be deemed to have begun operation on the date that the business first hired at least one employee in a full-time position. "Total project cost" means the costs incurred in connection with the redevelopment project by the developer until the issuance of a permanent certificate of occupancy, or upon such other event evidencing project completion as set forth in the incentive grant agreement, for a specific investment or improvement. "Tourism destination project" means a non-gaming business facility that will be among the most visited privately owned or operated tourism or recreation sites in the State, and which has been determined by the authority to be in an area appropriate for development and in need of economic development incentive assistance, including a non-gaming business within an established Tourism District with a significant impact on the economic viability of that district. "Transit hub" means an urban transit hub, as defined in section 2 of P.L.2007, c.346 (C.34:1B-208), that is located within an eligible municipality, as defined in section 2 of P.L.2007, c.346 (C.34:1B-208) and is located within a qualified incentive area. "Transit hub municipality" means a Transit Village or a municipality: which qualifies for State aid pursuant to P.L.1978, c.14 (C.52:27D-178 et seq.), or which has continued to be a qualified municipality thereunder pursuant to P.L.2007, c.111, and in which 30 percent or more of the value of real property was exempt from local property taxation during tax year 2006.  The percentage of exempt property shall be calculated by dividing the total exempt value by the sum of the net valuation which is taxable and that which is tax exempt. "Transit Village" means a municipality that has been designated as a transit village by the Commissioner of Transportation and the Transit Village Task Force. (cf: P.L.2025, c.127, s.13) 2.  Section 57 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-325) is amended to read as follows: 57.  a. Prior to March 1, 2029, a developer shall be eligible to receive an incentive award for a redevelopment project only if the developer demonstrates to the authority at the time of application that: (1)   without the incentive award, the redevelopment project is not economically feasible; (2)   a project financing gap exists, or the authority determines that the redevelopment project will generate a below market rate of return; (3)   the redevelopment project, except a film studio, professional stage, television studio, recording studio, screening room, or other infrastructure used for film production or a special mission non-profit project, is located in the incentive area; (4) except for demolition and site remediation activities, the developer has not commenced any construction at the site of the redevelopment project prior to submitting an application, unless the authority determines that the redevelopment project would not be completed otherwise or, in the event the redevelopment project is to be undertaken in phases, the requested incentive award is limited to only phases for which construction has not yet commenced; (5)   the redevelopment project shall comply with minimum environmental and sustainability standards; (6)   the redevelopment project shall comply with the authority's affirmative action requirements, adopted pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1979, c.303 (C.34:1B-5.4); (7)   (a) during the eligibility period, each worker employed to perform construction work at the redevelopment project shall be paid not less than the prevailing wage rate for the worker's craft or trade, as determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.) and P.L.2005, c.379 (C.34:11-56.58 et seq.); (b)   during the eligibility period, each worker employed to perform building services work at the redevelopment project, whether pursuant to contract by the developer or a commercial tenant, commercial subtenant, or other commercial occupant, shall be paid not less than the prevailing wage rate for the worker's craft or trade, as determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.) and P.L.2005, c.379 (C.34:11-56.58 et seq.), except that this requirement shall not apply to workers employed to perform building services work by a commercial tenant, commercial subtenant, or other commercial occupant that has a leasehold interest or other occupancy right in a redevelopment project, which leasehold interest or other occupancy right encompasses less than 5,000 square feet of space within the project.  The developer shall include in all commercial leases or other commercial occupancy agreements, and shall require that all subleases or other commercial occupancy agreements applicable to the redevelopment project include, a provision setting forth the requirements of this subparagraph, which provision shall be in a form acceptable to the authority.  Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, if a commercial tenant, commercial subtenant, or other commercial occupant violates this provision due to the underpayment of the required prevailing wage rate, then the issuance of tax credits to the developer and any co-applicant shall be delayed until such time as documentation demonstrating compliance has been provided to the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, subsequently reviewed and approved by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, and verified by the authority, which reviews and verification shall be completed.  If a violation is not cured, or is not capable of being cured, within one year of receipt of notice of the violation, then the developer and any co-applicant shall forfeit 50 percent of the tax credits otherwise authorized for the tax period in which the notice of violation was issued.  If the violation is not cured on or before the conclusion of that tax period, the developer and any co-applicant shall forfeit up to 100 percent of the tax credits otherwise authorized, as determined by the authority, in each subsequent tax period until the first tax period for which documentation demonstrating compliance has been provided to the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, subsequently reviewed and approved by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, and verified by the authority, which reviews and verifications shall be completed.  In this event, the developer and any co-applicant shall be allowed the full tax credit amount beginning in the tax period in which documentation of compliance was reviewed and approved by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development and verified by the authority, including each subsequent tax period in which the tax credits are otherwise authorized.  The requirement of this subparagraph shall not apply to the residential tenants or residential subtenants of a redevelopment project; (c)   in the event a redevelopment project, or any portion thereof, is undertaken by a tenant pursuant to a contract and the tenant has a leasehold of more than 55 percent of space in the building owned or controlled by the developer, the requirement that each worker employed to perform building service work at the building be paid not less than the prevailing wage shall apply to the entire building, except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (b) of this paragraph for commercial tenants, commercial subtenants, or other commercial occupants with a leasehold interest or other occupancy right encompassing less than 5,000 square feet.  The requirement of this subparagraph shall not apply to the residential tenants or residential subtenants of a redevelopment project; (8)   (a) the redevelopment project shall be completed, and the developer shall be issued a certificate of occupancy for the redevelopment project facilities by the applicable enforcing agency, within four years of executing the incentive award agreement, or in the case of a redevelopment project with a project cost in excess of $50,000,000, the incentive phase agreement corresponding to the redevelopment project; or (b)   in the discretion of the authority, a redevelopment project with a  project cost in excess of $50,000,000, and that is authorized to be completed in phases, may be allowed no more than six years from the date on which the incentive award agreement is executed to be issued a certificate of occupancy by the applicable enforcement agency; (9)   the developer has complied with all requirements for filing tax and information returns and for paying or remitting required State taxes and fees by submitting, as a part of the application, a tax clearance certificate, as described in section 1 of P.L.2007, c.101 (C.54:50-39); and (10)  the developer is not more than 24 months in arrears at the time of application. b.    In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection a. of this section, for a commercial project to qualify for an incentive award, the developer shall demonstrate that the developer shall contribute capital of at least 20 percent of the total project cost, or at least $30,000,000 for an institutional project, except that:  if a redevelopment project is located in a government-restricted municipality, the developer shall contribute capital of at least 10 percent of the total project cost; or if the redevelopment project is a distressed hospital project, the developer shall not be subject to the requirements of this subsection. c.     In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection a. of this section, for a residential project or a commercial project comprised solely of a health care or health service center to qualify for an incentive award, the residential project or health care or health service center shall: (1) have a total project cost of at least $17,500,000, if the project is located in a municipality with a population greater than 200,000 according to the latest federal decennial census; (2) have a total project cost of at least $10,000,000 if the project is located in a municipality with a population less than 200,000 according to the latest federal decennial census; or (3) have a total project cost of at least $5,000,000 if the project is in a qualified incentive tract or government-restricted municipality. d.    In addition to the requirements set forth in subsections a. and c. of this section, for a residential project consisting of newly-constructed residential units to qualify for an incentive award, the developer shall reserve at least 20 percent of the residential units constructed for occupancy by low- and moderate-income households with affordability controls as adopted by the authority, in consultation with the agency, in accordance with paragraph (2) of subsection a. of section 56 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-324), except that a residential project receiving a federal historic rehabilitation tax credit pursuant to section 47 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.47, or a tax credit pursuant to the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through 34:1B-276), shall be exempt from the affordability controls related to bedroom distribution. e.     Prior to the board considering an application submitted by a developer, the authority shall confirm with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the Department of Environmental Protection, and the Department of the Treasury whether the developer is in substantial good standing with the respective department, or has entered into an agreement with the respective department that includes a practical corrective action plan for the developer.  The developer shall certify that any contractors or subcontractors that will perform work at the redevelopment project: (1) are registered as required by "The Public Works Contractor Registration Act," P.L.1999, c.238 (C.34:11-56.48 et seq.); (2) have not been debarred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development from engaging in or bidding on Public Works Contracts in the State; and (3) possess a tax clearance certificate issued by the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury.  The authority may also contract with an independent third party to perform a background check on the developer. f.     Beginning on the fourth year of the eligibility period for a commercial project, and through the conclusion of the eligibility period, if the average occupancy rate of the commercial project is less than 60 percent during any applicable tax period, the developer and co-applicant shall forfeit all credits otherwise allowed for the tax period and for each subsequent tax period until the authority verifies documentation, submitted by the developer or co-applicant, demonstrating that the average occupancy rate has reached or surpassed 60 percent for the tax period.  The full amount of credit shall be allowed to a developer and any co-applicant for the tax period in which the average occupancy rate reaches or surpasses 60 percent.  Occupancy for the tax period shall be determined by the average of the monthly occupancy for the applicable tax period.  The occupancy requirement in this subsection shall not apply to residential projects. (cf: P.L.2025, c.2, s.3) 3.    Section 58 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-326) is amended to read as follows: 58. a. Prior to March 1, 2029, for redevelopment projects eligible pursuant to section 57 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-325) for which a developer is seeking an incentive award for the redevelopment project, the developer shall submit an application to the authority and, in the case of a residential project, shall submit an application to the authority and the agency, in a form and manner prescribed in regulations adopted by the authority pursuant to section 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-335).  The authority shall accept applications for incentive awards during the grant periods established pursuant to section 59 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-327). b.    The authority shall not consider an application for a commercial project unless the developer submits a letter evidencing support for the commercial project from the governing body of the municipality in which the commercial project is located with the application. c.     The authority shall review the project cost, evaluate and validate the project financing gap estimated by the developer, and conduct a State fiscal impact analysis to ensure that the overall public assistance provided to the project will result in a net positive benefit to the State, provided that the net benefit analysis shall not apply to capital investment for a food delivery source; a health care or health services center; an institutional project; a distressed hospital project; or a residential project.  In determining whether a project will result in a net positive benefit to the State, the authority shall not consider the value of any taxes exempted, abated, rebated, or retained under the "Five-Year Exemption and Abatement Law," P.L.1991, c.441 (C.40A:21-1 et seq.), the "Long Term Tax Exemption Law," P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et al.), the "New Jersey Urban Enterprise Zones Act," P.L.1983, c.303 (C.52:27H-60 [et seq.] et al.), or any other law that has the effect of lowering or eliminating the developer's State or local tax liability.  The determination made pursuant to this subsection shall be based on the potential tax liability of the developer without regard for potential tax losses if the developer were to locate in another state.  The authority shall assess the cost of these reviews to the applicant. A developer shall pay to the authority the full amount of the direct costs of an analysis concerning the developer's application for a tax credit that a third party retained by the authority performs, if the authority deems such retention to be necessary.  The authority shall evaluate the net economic benefits on a present value basis under which the requested tax credit allocation amount is discounted to present value at the same discount rate as the projected benefits from the implementation of the proposed redevelopment project for which an award of tax credits is being sought. d.    (1) For a redevelopment project subject to the requirement of subsection c. of this section to be eligible for any tax credits under the program, a developer shall demonstrate to the authority that the award of tax credits will yield a net positive benefit to the State equaling an amount determined by the authority through regulation that exceeds the requested tax credit amount.  The developer shall certify, under the penalty of perjury, that all documents submitted, and factual assertions made, to the authority to demonstrate that the award of tax credits will yield a net positive benefit to the State in accordance with this subsection are true and accurate at the time of submission. (2)   A redevelopment project located in a government-restricted municipality shall yield a net positive benefit to the State that exceeds the requested tax credit amount, but the net benefit requirement set by the authority for such redevelopment projects may be up to 35 percentage points lower than the net benefit requirement set by the authority for all other eligible redevelopment projects. (3)   A commercial project that contains 50,000 or more square feet of space devoted to research or technology focused incubator and conferencing facilities for one or more institutions of higher education or non-profit organizations, and which has a total project cost of not less than $50 million, shall yield a net positive benefit to the State that exceeds the requested tax credit amount, but the net benefit requirement set by the authority for such redevelopment projects may be up to 35 percentage points lower than the net benefit requirement set by the authority for all other eligible redevelopment projects. (4)   A redevelopment project that is predominantly commercial and that receives a federal historic rehabilitation tax credit pursuant to section 47 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.47, or a tax credit pursuant to the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through 34:1B-276), shall yield a net positive benefit to the State that exceeds the requested tax credit amount, but the net benefit requirement set by the authority for such redevelopment projects may be up to 35 percentage points lower than the net benefit requirement set by the authority for all other eligible redevelopment projects. (5)   A commercial project that is located on land owned by the federal government on or before December 31, 2005 shall yield a net positive benefit to the State that exceeds the requested tax credit amount, but the net benefit requirement set by the authority for such redevelopment projects may be up to 35 percentage points lower than the net benefit requirement set by the authority for all other eligible redevelopment projects. (6)   A redevelopment project that is undertaken by a major cultural institution to renovate existing space or expand services into additional space, and in which the major cultural institution realizes all returns from the redevelopment project, shall yield a net positive benefit to the State that exceeds the requested tax credit amount, but the net benefit requirement set by the authority for such redevelopment projects may be lower than the net benefit requirement set by the authority for all other eligible redevelopment projects. e.     If at any time during the eligibility period the authority determines that the developer made a material misrepresentation on the developer's application, the developer shall forfeit the incentive award. f.     If circumstances require a developer to amend its application to the authority, then the developer, or an authorized agent of the developer, shall certify to the authority that the information provided in its amended application is true under the penalty of perjury. (cf: P.L.2023, c.98, s.4) 4.  Section 60 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-328) is amended to read as follows: 60. a. (1) Following approval and selection of an application pursuant to sections 58 and 59 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-326 and C.34:1B-327), the authority shall enter into an incentive award agreement with the developer.  The chief executive officer of the authority shall negotiate the terms and conditions of the incentive award agreement on behalf of the State. (2) For a phased project, the incentive phase agreement shall set forth, for each phase of the project and for the total project, the capital investment requirements and the time periods in which each phase of the project shall be commenced and completed.  The awarding of tax credits shall be conditioned on the developer's compliance with the requirements of the agreement.  A redevelopment project may be completed in phases in accordance with rules adopted by the authority if the redevelopment project has an eligible project cost in excess of $50,000,000. b.    An incentive award agreement shall specify the amount of the incentive award the authority shall award to the developer and the duration of the eligibility period.  The duration of the eligibility period shall not exceed 10 years for a commercial project, mixed-use project, or residential project, except that to reduce the total value of tax credits needed to reimburse a developer for all or part of the project financing gap of a redevelopment project, the authority may, in its discretion, approve a duration for the eligibility period that is shorter than the applicable maximum periods.  The incentive award agreement shall provide an estimated date of completion and include a requirement for periodic progress reports, including the submittal of executed financing commitments and documents that evidence site control, provided, however, that the developer may sell one or more buildings during the eligibility period, subject to such rules and regulations as may be adopted by the authority.  If the authority does not receive periodic progress reports, or if the progress reports demonstrate unsatisfactory progress, then the authority may rescind the incentive award. If the authority rescinds an incentive award in the same calendar year in which the authority approved the incentive award, then the authority may assign the incentive award to another applicant.  The incentive award agreement may also provide for a verification of the financing gap at the time the developer provides executed financing commitments to the authority and a verification of the developer's projected cash flow at the time of certification that the project is completed, provided that the authority shall not resize or reduce the tax credit based on the executed financing commitments or the updated projected cash flow, but that the authority shall use the commitments and cash flow to calculate the return on investment required pursuant to subsection c. of this section. c.     (1) To ensure the protection of taxpayer money, at project certification and at the end of the seventh year of the eligibility period, the authority shall evaluate the developer's rate of return on investment and compare that rate of return on investment to the reasonable and appropriate rate of return at the time of board approval.  If the actual rate of return on investment exceeds the reasonable and appropriate rate of return on investment at the time of board approval by more than 15 percent, the authority shall require the developer to pay up to 20 percent of the amount in excess of the reasonable and appropriate rate of return on investment.  For any year during the eligibility period in which the director purchases a tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate issued for a redevelopment project pursuant to section 89 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.52:18A-263), if the actual rate of return on investment exceeds the reasonable and appropriate rate of return on investment at the time of board approval by more than 10 percent, the authority shall require the developer to pay up to 20 percent of the amount in excess of the reasonable and appropriate rate of return on investment, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of subsection a. of section 89 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.52:18A-263).  The authority shall require an escrow account to be held by the authority for any payment received pursuant to this subsection until the end of the eligibility period.  For any payment amount calculated at project certification, the developer shall make equal annual payments, which in aggregate shall equal the calculated payment amount, with each annual report for the first seven years of the eligibility period.  At the end of the seventh year of the eligibility period, the developer shall pay the authority any additional amount required.  For projects that have an eligibility period of fewer than 10 years, the authority may adjust the year of the eligibility period in which the evaluation of the rate of return and contribution to the escrow account, as may be appropriate, are required.  The authority shall not reduce or recapture any tax credits at project certification or at the end of the seventh year of the eligibility period solely due to an increase to the return on investment. Following the final year of the eligibility period, the authority shall determine if the developer's rate of return exceeded the reasonable and appropriate rate of return determined at board approval.  If the final rate of return does not exceed the reasonable and appropriate rate of return determined at board approval, the authority shall release to the developer the escrowed funds.  If the project final rate of return exceeds the reasonable and appropriate rate of return determined at board approval, the authority shall require the developer to pay up to 20 percent of the amount of the excess, which shall include the funds held in escrow, and such funds shall be deposited in the State General Fund.  The requirements of this paragraph shall not apply to a distressed hospital project. (2)   If, at any time during the eligibility period, a distressed hospital project ceases to operate any general acute care hospital licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.), the authority shall rescind an award and recapture all or part of any tax credits awarded to the developer of the distressed hospital project, including all or part of any tax credits claimed by the developer of the distressed hospital project prior to such determination, with penalties and interest. d.    The incentive award agreement shall include a requirement that the authority confirm with the Department of Environmental Protection, the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, and the Department of the Treasury that the developer is in substantial good standing with the respective department, or the developer has entered into an agreement with the respective department that includes a practical corrective action for the developer, and the developer shall confirm that each contractor or subcontractor performing work at the redevelopment project: (1) is registered as required by "The Public Works Contractor Registration Act," P.L.1999, c.238 (C.34:11-56.48 et seq.); (2) has not been debarred, suspended, or disqualified by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development from engaging in or bidding on Public Works Contracts in the State, or been debarred, suspended, or disqualified by a federal agency from engaging in federally funded construction projects or bidding on federal contracting opportunities; and (3) possesses a tax clearance certificate issued by the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury.  The incentive award agreement shall also include a provision that the developer shall forfeit the incentive award in any year in which the developer is neither in substantial good standing with each department nor has entered into a practical corrective action.  The incentive award agreement shall also require a developer to engage in on-site consultations with the Division of Workplace Safety and Health in the Department of Health. e. (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the authority shall not enter into an incentive award agreement for a redevelopment project that includes at least one retail establishment which will have more than 10 employees, at least one distribution center which will have more than 20 employees, or at least one hospitality establishment which will have more than 10 employees, unless the incentive award agreement includes a precondition that any business that serves as the owner or operator of the retail establishment, distribution center, or hospitality establishment enters into a labor harmony agreement with a labor organization or cooperating labor organizations which represent retail establishment, hospitality establishment, or distribution center employees in the State. (2) A labor harmony agreement shall be required only if the State has a proprietary interest in the redevelopment project and shall remain in effect for as long as the State acts as a market participant in the redevelopment project.  The authority may enter into an incentive award agreement with a developer without the labor harmony agreement required under paragraph (1) of this subsection if the authority determines that the redevelopment project would not be able to go forward if a labor harmony agreement is required.  The authority shall support the determination by a written finding, which provides the specific basis for the determination. (3) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2023, c.98) f. (1) Except for a special mission non-profit project or a distressed hospital project in any location, or a residential project that is located in a government-restricted municipality and in which 100 percent of the residential units constructed in the residential project are reserved for occupancy by low- and moderate-income households, for a redevelopment project whose total project cost equals or exceeds $10 million, in addition to the incentive award agreement, a developer shall enter into a community benefits agreement with the authority and the county or municipality in which the redevelopment project is located.  The agreement may include, but shall not be limited to, requirements for training, employment, and youth development and free services to underserved communities in and around the community in which the redevelopment project is located. Prior to entering a community benefits agreement, the county or municipality in which the redevelopment project is located shall hold at least one previously advertised public hearing at which testimony from residents, community groups, and other stakeholders shall have an opportunity to be heard on the needs of the community that the agreement should address, and the minutes of the meeting shall be included in the resolution of the governing body of the municipality or county adopting the community benefits agreement. (2)  The community benefits agreement shall provide for the creation of a community advisory committee to oversee the implementation of the agreement, monitor successes, ensure compliance with the terms of the agreement, and produce an annual public report. The community advisory committee created pursuant to this paragraph shall be comprised of representatives of diverse community groups and residents of the county or municipality in which the redevelopment project is located. (3)  At the time the developer submits the annual report required pursuant to section 62 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-330) to the authority, the developer shall certify, under the penalty of perjury, that it is in compliance with the terms of the community benefits agreement.  If the developer fails to provide the certification required pursuant to this paragraph or the authority determines that the developer is not in compliance with the terms of the community benefits agreement based on the reports submitted by the community advisory committee pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, then the authority may rescind an award or recapture all or part of any tax credits awarded. (4)  Notwithstanding any requirement of this subsection to the contrary, a developer shall be considered to have met the requirements of a community benefits agreement pursuant to this subsection if the developer submits to the authority: (a) a copy of either the developer's approval letter from the authority or a redevelopment agreement applicable to the qualified business facility, provided that the approval letter or redevelopment agreement is certified by the municipality in which the redevelopment project is located, and includes provisions that meet or exceed the standards required for a community benefits agreement in this subsection, as determined by the chief executive officer pursuant to rules adopted by the authority; or (b) a resolution adopted by the governing body of the municipality in which the redevelopment project is located, which resolution shall be adopted after at least one public hearing at which the governing body provides an opportunity for residents, community groups, and other stakeholders to testify, and which resolution shall state that the governing body has determined that the redevelopment project will provide economic and social benefits to the community that fulfill the purposes of this subsection, which benefits render a separate community benefit agreement unnecessary, and explain the reasons supporting the governing body's determination. (c)  The developer and the municipality or county shall submit the executed community benefits agreement, redevelopment agreement, or approved resolution to the authority within the same time as all other conditions subsequent required in the approval letter. g.    A developer shall submit, prior to the first disbursement of tax credits under the incentive award agreement, but no later than six months following project completion, satisfactory evidence of actual project costs, as certified by a certified public accountant, evidence of a temporary certificate of occupancy, or other event evidencing project completion that begins the eligibility period indicated in the incentive award agreement.  The developer, or an authorized agent of the developer, shall certify that the information provided pursuant to this subsection is true under the penalty of perjury.  Claims, records, or statements submitted by a developer to the authority in order to receive tax credits shall not be considered claims, records, or statements made in connection with State tax laws. h.    The incentive award agreement shall include a provision allowing the authority to extend, in individual cases, the deadline for any annual reporting or certification requirement. i.     The incentive award agreement shall include one or more provisions, as determined by the authority, concerning the terms and conditions for default and the remedies for the developer of a redevelopment project in the event of default.  The incentive award agreement shall not allow the authority to declare a cross-default when the developer of a redevelopment project, including any business affiliate of the developer or any other entity with common principals as the developer, is in default with any other assistance program administered by the authority. (cf: P.L.2025, c.2, s.4) 5.  Section 61 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-329) is amended to read as follows: 61.  a. Up to the limits established in subsection b. of this section and in accordance with an incentive award agreement, beginning upon the receipt of occupancy permits for any portion of the redevelopment project, or upon any other event evidencing project completion as set forth in the incentive award agreement, a developer shall be allowed a total tax credit that shall not exceed: (1) (a) 85 percent of the eligible project cost for:  a redevelopment project that is located in a government-restricted municipality, which municipality qualified as a government-restricted municipality prior to the effective date of P.L.2025, c.2 (C.34:1B-335.3 et al.) ; a distressed hospital project; or a special mission non-profit project; or (b)   80 percent of the eligible project cost for: a redevelopment project that is located in a government-restricted municipality, which municipality did not qualify as a government-restricted municipality prior to the effective date of P.L.2025, c.2 (C.34:1B-335.3 et al.); or an institutional project; (2) 60 percent of the eligible project cost for a residential project that receives a four-percent allocation from the federal Low Income Housing Tax Credit Program administered by the agency or a redevelopment project that is located in a qualified incentive tract, enhanced area, or a municipality with a Municipal Revitalization Index score of at least 50; or (3)   50 percent of the eligible project cost for any other redevelopment project. b.    The value of all tax credits approved by the authority under the program for a redevelopment project phase shall not exceed: (1)   $120,000,000 per redevelopment project or phase for a redevelopment project that is located in a government-restricted municipality, or is an institutional project, a special mission non-profit project, or a distressed hospital project; (2)   $90,000,000 per redevelopment project or phase for a redevelopment project that is allowed a tax credit under paragraph (2) of subsection a. of this section; and (3)   $60,000,000 for any other redevelopment project or phase. (cf: P.L.2025, c.2, s.5) 6.    Section 65 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-333) is amended to read as follows: 65.  a. As used in this section, "transformative project" means a redevelopment project: that has a project financing gap; that has a total project cost of at least $150,000,000; that includes 200,000 or more square feet of new or substantially renovated industrial, commercial, or residential space for a project located in a government-restricted municipality, that includes 250,000 or more square feet of film studios, professional stages, television studios, recording studios, screening rooms, or other infrastructure for film production, that includes 300,000 or more square feet of new or substantially renovated industrial, commercial, or residential space for a project located in an enhanced area, [or] that includes 500,000 or more square feet of new or substantially renovated industrial, commercial, or residential space for any other project, or that includes 200,000 or more square feet for a distressed hospital project; and, for a commercial project, that is of special economic importance as measured by the level of new jobs, new capital investment, opportunities to leverage leadership in a high-priority targeted industry, or other state priorities as determined by the authority pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated to implement this section.  Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection b. of section 14 of P.L.2023, c.98 (C.34:1B-335.1) to the contrary, for applications submitted on and after the effective date of P.L.2023, c.98 (C.34:1B-335.1 et al.), if the redevelopment project is located entirely on land designated by the Department of Environmental Protection as a brownfield development area pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2005, c.223 (C.58:10B-25.1), and the eligible project cost of the redevelopment project includes at least $15,000,000 in environmental remediation costs, the redevelopment project shall constitute a project of special economic importance.  For applications submitted on or after the effective date of P.L.2025, c.127, the redevelopment project shall constitute a project of special economic importance if the redevelopment project is a health care or health services center that:  is associated with, and located on, the same complex as a new or existing university, academic, or medical research center, institution, or facility; is an establishment that is associated with a National Cancer Institute Designated Comprehensive Cancer Center that is engaged in cancer research; is a transformative expansion of healthcare services by an academic medical and research center located in a distressed municipality that is adjacent to existing clinical facilities; or is a project located at a State-designated trauma center.  A transformative project may be completed in phases, which phases may be determined by the authority based on factors such as written architectural plans and specifications completed before or during the physical work, certificates of occupancy, or financial and operational plans.  The criteria developed by the authority shall include, but shall not be limited to: (1)   the extent to which the proposed transformative project would create modern facilities that enhance the State's competitiveness in attracting targeted industries; (2)   (a) for a residential project, the construction of 700 or more new residential units; (b)   for a mixed-use residential project containing fewer than 700 new residential units: (i)    the construction of 200 or more new residential units if the project is located in a government-restricted municipality, 300 or more new residential units if the project is located in an enhanced area, or 400 or more new residential units for all other mixed-use projects; and (ii)   the construction of 30,000 square feet or more of commercial space, which commercial space may include retail space; and (c)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2025, c.2) (d)   for a residential project, 20 percent of the new residential units shall be constructed for occupancy by low- and moderate-income households with affordability controls as adopted by the authority, in consultation with the agency, in accordance with paragraph (2) of subsection a. of section 56 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-324), except that a residential project receiving a federal historic rehabilitation tax credit pursuant to section 47 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.47, or a tax credit pursuant to the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through 34:1B-276), shall be exempt from the affordability controls related to bedroom distribution; and (3)   the extent to which the proposed project would leverage the competitive economic development advantages of the State's mass transit assets, higher education assets, and other economic development assets in attracting or retaining both employers and skilled workers generally or in targeted industries. A "transformative project" shall not include a redevelopment project at which more than 50 percent of the premises is occupied by one or more businesses engaged in final point of sale retail. b. (1) The authority may award incentive awards to transformative projects in accordance with the provisions of sections 55 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-323 through 34:1B-335). (2)   (a) For transformative projects completed in phases, the developer shall enter into a transformative phase agreement with the authority. (b)   As used in this subsection, "transformative phase agreement" shall mean a sub-agreement of the incentive award agreement that governs the timing, capital investment, and other applicable details of the respective phase of a phased project. (3)   Notwithstanding the provisions of section 57 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-325), or any other section of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.) to the contrary, a transformative project shall be completed, and the developer shall be issued a certificate of occupancy for the transformative project facilities by the applicable enforcing agency, within five years of executing the incentive award agreement, except that the authority may, in its discretion, extend this deadline by up to one additional year.  For transformative projects completed in phases, the transformative project shall be completed, and the developer shall be issued certificates of occupancy for all phases of the transformative project facilities by the applicable enforcing agency, within 10 years of executing either the incentive award agreement or the first transformative phase agreement corresponding to the transformative project. (4)   Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 55 and 60 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-323 and C.34:1B-328), or any other section of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.) to the contrary, each phase of a transformative project completed in phases shall have a separate eligibility period.  After completing each phase, the developer shall submit a certification that the phase is completed.  If the authority approves the certification, the tax credit allowed to the developer shall be increased by the tax credit amount corresponding to that phase. Notwithstanding the different eligibility periods for each phase, all conditions and requirements applicable during an eligibility period pursuant to sections 55 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-323 through 34:1B-335) shall apply to the entire transformative project until the end of the eligibility period for the last phase. (5)   Notwithstanding the provisions of section 60 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-328), or any other section of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.) to the contrary, for a transformative project completed in phases, a review of the project financing gap shall be performed at the certification of completion of each phase, and the authority shall re-evaluate the developer's rate of return in the seventh year and at the end of the eligibility period for the last phase, provided that the authority may also re-evaluate the developer's rate of return during the fifth year of any earlier phase.  The requirement of this paragraph shall not apply to distressed hospital projects. (6)   A transformative project receiving an incentive award pursuant to this section, other than a project that includes 250,000 or more square feet of film studios, professional stages, television studios, recording studios, screening rooms or other infrastructure for film production, shall be located in an incentive area, a distressed municipality, a government-restricted municipality, or an enhanced area.  A transformative project receiving an incentive award pursuant to this section that includes 250,000 or more square feet of film studios, professional stages, television studios, recording studios, screening rooms, or other infrastructure for film production may be located anywhere in the State.  The authority shall not consider an application for a transformative project unless the applicant submits with its application a letter evidencing support for the transformative project from the governing body of the municipality in which the transformative project is located. c.     The authority shall review the transformative project cost, evaluate and validate the project financing gap estimated by the developer, and conduct a State fiscal impact analysis to ensure that the overall public assistance provided to the transformative project will result in a net positive benefit to the State.  In determining whether a transformative project will result in a net positive benefit to the State, the authority shall not consider the value of any taxes exempted, abated, rebated, or retained under the "Five-Year Exemption and Abatement Law," P.L.1991, c.441 (C.40A:21-1 et seq.), the "Long Term Tax Exemption Law," P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et al.), the "New Jersey Urban Enterprise Zones Act," P.L.1983, c.303 (C.52:27H-60 et seq.), or any other law that has the effect of lowering or eliminating the developer's State or local tax liability.  The determination made pursuant to this subsection shall be based on the potential tax liability of the developer without regard for potential tax losses if the developer were to locate in another state.  The authority shall assess the cost of these reviews to the applicant.  A developer shall pay to the authority the full amount of the direct costs of an analysis concerning the developer's application for an incentive award that a third party retained by the authority performs, if the authority deems such retention to be necessary.  The authority shall evaluate the net economic benefits on a present value basis under which the requested tax credit allocation amount is discounted to present value at the same discount rate as the projected benefits from the implementation of the proposed transformative project for which an award of tax credits is being sought. Projects that are predominantly residential, that are institutional projects, that are distressed hospital projects, or that qualify as special mission non-profit projects shall be excluded from the calculation of the net benefit test required pursuant to this subsection. d.    In determining net benefits for any business or person considering locating in a transformative project and applying to receive from the authority any other economic development incentive subsequent to the award of transformative project tax credits pursuant to section 65 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-333), the authority shall not credit the business or person with any benefit that was previously credited to the transformative project pursuant to section 65 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-333). e.     The authority shall administer the credits awarded pursuant to this section in accordance with the provisions of sections 62 and 63 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-330 and C.34:1B-331). f.     Prior to allocating an incentive award to a developer, the authority shall confirm with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the Department of Environmental Protection, and the Department of the Treasury that the developer is in substantial good standing with the respective department, or the developer has entered into an agreement with the respective department that includes a practical corrective action plan, and the developer shall certify that each contractor or subcontractor performing work at the transformative project: (1) is registered as required by "The Public Works Contractor Registration Act," P.L.1999, c.238 (C.34:11-56.48 et seq.); (2) has not been debarred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development from engaging in or bidding on Public Works Contracts in the State; and (3) possesses a tax clearance certificate issued by the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury.  The authority may also contract with an independent third party to perform a background check on the developer. g.    Notwithstanding the limitation on incentive awards set forth in subsection b. of section 61 and section 98 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-329 and C.34:1B-362) to the contrary, the authority may allow a developer of a transformative project a tax credit in an amount not to exceed the lesser of: (1)   (a) (i) 85 percent of the eligible project cost for a transformative project that is: located in a government-restricted municipality, which municipality qualified as a government-restricted municipality prior to the effective date of P.L.2025, c.2 (C.34:1B-335.3 et al.); or a distressed hospital project; or (ii)   80 percent of the eligible project cost for a transformative project that is: located in a government-restricted municipality, which municipality did not qualify as a government-restricted municipality prior to the effective date of P.L.2025, c.2 (C.34:1B-335.3 et al.); or an institutional project; (b)   60 percent of the eligible project cost for a residential transformative project that receives a four-percent allocation from the federal Low Income Housing Tax Credit Program administered by the agency or a transformative project that is located in a qualified incentive tract, enhanced area, or a municipality with a Municipal Revitalization Index score of at least 50; or (c)   50 percent of the eligible project cost for any other transformative project; (2)   the total value of the project financing gap; or (3)   $400,000,000 except that for a transformative project that is developed in phases, the $400,000,000 limitation on incentive awards set forth in this paragraph shall apply to the total aggregate award for all phases of the transformative project. (cf: P.L.2025, c.127, s.14) 7.  This act shall take effect immediately.